Indiana, session 2026, SB157.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
1 SECTION 1. IC 27-1-24.6-6, AS ADDED BY P.L.216-2025,
2 SECTION 41, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
3 JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6. (a) A health plan must provide the amount of
4 the national average drug acquisition cost for a generic drug to the plan
5 sponsor.
6 (b) This subsection does not apply to a hospital licensed under
7 IC 16-21-2, a federally qualified health center (as defined in 42
8 U.S.C. 1396d(l)(2)(B)), or a health facility licensed under IC 16-28.
9 A pharmacist (as defined in IC 27-1-24.5-9) or pharmacy (as
10 defined in IC 27-1-24.5-11) must provide the amount of the
11 national average drug acquisition cost for a generic drug on the
12 written materials provided to an individual at the point of sale of
13 the generic drug.
SB 157—LS 6545/DI 154

2
COMMITTEE REPORT
Mr. President: The Senate Committee on Insurance and Financial
Institutions, to which was referred Senate Bill No. 157, has had the
same under consideration and begs leave to report the same back to the
Senate with the recommendation that said bill be AMENDED as
follows:
Delete everything after the enacting clause and insert the following:
(SEE TEXT OF BILL)
and when so amended that said bill do pass.
(Reference is to SB 157 as introduced.)
BALDWIN, Chairperson
Committee Vote: Yeas 9, Nays 0.
_____
SENATE MOTION
Mr. President: I move that Senate Bill 157 be amended to read as
follows:
Page 1, line 6, after "(b)" insert "This subsection does not apply to
a hospital licensed under IC 16-21-2, a federally qualified health
center (as defined in 42 U.S.C. 1396d(l)(2)(B)), or a health facility
licensed under IC 16-28.".
(Reference is to SB 157 as printed January 16, 2026.)
BOHACEK
SB 157—LS 6545/DI 154